Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.748

[Art. 108] Military property—Loss, damage, destruction, or wrongful disposition.

Any person subject to this code who, without proper authority:

(1) Sells or otherwise disposes of;

(2) Wilfully or through neglect damages, destroys, or loses; or

(3) Wilfully or through neglect suffers to be damaged, destroyed, sold or wrongfully disposed of;

any military property of the United States or of the state shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 106.]